Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.030

General duties.

The secretary of state shall:

(1) Keep a register of and attest the official acts of the governor;

(2) Affix the state seal, with his or her attestation, to commissions, pardons, and other public instruments to which the signature of the governor is required, and also attestations and authentications of certificates and other documents properly issued by the secretary;

(3) Record all articles of incorporation, deeds, or other papers filed in the secretary of state's office;

(4) Receive and file all the official bonds of officers required to be filed with the secretary of state;

(5) Take and file in the secretary of state's office receipts for all books distributed by him or her;

(6) Certify to the legislature the election returns for all officers required by the Constitution to be so certified, and certify to the governor the names of all other persons who have received at any election the highest number of votes for any office the incumbent of which is to be commissioned by the governor;

(7) Furnish, on demand, to any person paying the fees therefor, a certified copy of all or any part of any law, record, or other instrument filed, deposited, or recorded in the secretary of state's office;

(8) Present to the speaker of the house of representatives, at the beginning of each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, a full account of all purchases made and expenses incurred by the secretary of state on account of the state;

(9) File in his or her office an impression of each and every seal in use by any state officer;

(10) Keep a record of all fees charged or received by the secretary of state.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5026; 1982 c 35 s 186; 1980 c 87 s 21; 1969 ex.s. c 53 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.07.030. Prior: 1890 p 630 s 2; RRS s 10992.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.